Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.050

Reports.

A savings bank shall render to the director, in such form as he or she shall prescribe, at least three regular reports each year exhibiting its resources and liabilities as of such dates as the director shall designate, which shall be the dates designated by the comptroller of the currency of the United States for reports of national banking associations. Every such report, in a condensed form to be prescribed by the director, shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation, published in the place where the bank is located. A savings bank shall also make such special reports as the director shall call for. A regular report shall be filed with the director within thirty days and proof of the publication thereof within forty days from the date of the issuance of the call for the report. A special report shall be filed within such time as the director shall indicate in the call therefor. A savings bank that fails to file within the prescribed time any report required by this section or proof of the publication of any report required to be published shall be subject to a penalty to the state of fifty dollars for each day's delay, recoverable by a civil action brought by the attorney general in the name of the state.

[ 1994 c 92 s 296; 1977 ex.s. c 241 s 1; 1955 c 13 s 32.04.050. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 86 s 13; 1915 c 175 s 39; RRS s 3368a.]